Massachusetts, session 194th, S2322.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Not later than September 30, 2026 and every 3 years thereafter, the
secretary of energy and environmental affairs or a designee shall publish a comprehensive
energy plan as established under executive order 569 which shall include and be based upon
reasonable projections of the commonwealth’s energy demands for electricity, transportation and
thermal conditioning and shall also include strategies for meeting those demands in a regional
context, prioritizing meeting energy demand through conservation, energy efficiency and other
demand-reduction resources in a manner that contributes to the commonwealth meeting the
limits for 2030 and 2040 pursuant to subsection (b) of section 3 of chapter 21N of the General
Laws.”
of 2

SECTION 2. The department of energy resources in conjunction with the executive
office of environmental affairs shall monitor available supplies and projected costs of energy so
as to determine if within 12 months there will be a foreseeable deficiency in the amount of
energy reasonably expected to meet demand, or that one or more conditions will be reasonably
expected to cause an increase to consumers of more than ten percent, provided that if either of
these are so determined, the department of energy resources in conjunction with the executive
office of environmental affairs, shall develop a contingency plan to prevent, mitigate, or
otherwise address their impacts. Such contingency plan shall contain, to the maximum feasible
extent :
a) the cause of such deficiency or cost increase and the probability that it will occur
b) one or more actions than can be undertaken on a timely basis to prevent, mitigate, or
otherwise address one or more of these impacts
c) identify the appropriate entity of state government to take such actions
d) an estimated time frame for such actions to be implemented
The development of such contingency plan shall include not less than one public hearing,
the ability to receive written testimony, and consultation with the department of public utilities,
the department of telecommunications and energy, the clean energy center, the attorney general
of the commonwealth, and, to the extent possible and where relevant, the independent systems
operator for the New England. Said plan shall be filed with the Joint Committee on
Telecommunications, Utilities, and Energy, and the clerks of the House and Senate, whom shall
post it electronically for public inspection.
of 2